zh-CN: 适用邮箱类型: 立柱式邮箱; 投递箱; 信报箱; 多单元信箱; 包裹邮箱; 包裹柜; 杆式安装邮箱; 乡村邮箱; 壁挂式邮箱; 其他
fr: Type de boîte aux lettres compatible: Boîte aux lettres sur colonne; Boîte de dépôt; boîte aux lettres; Boîte aux lettres collective; Boîte aux colis; Casier colis; Boîte aux lettres sur poteau; boîte aux lettres rurale; Boîte aux lettres murale; Autre
tr: Uyumlu posta kutusu türü: Kolon tipi posta kutusu; Bırakma kutusu; Posta kutusu; Çoklu bölmeli posta kutusu; Paket alım posta kutusu; Kargo dolabı; Direğe monte posta kutusu; Kırsal posta kutusu; Duvara monte posta kutusu; Diğer
lt-LT: Suderinamas pašto dėžutės tipas: Ant stulpelio tvirtinama pašto dėžutė; Įmetimo dėžė; Pašto dėžutė; Daugiafunkcinė pašto dėžutė; Siuntų pašto dėžutė; Siuntų spintelė; Ant stulpų tvirtinama pašto dėžutė; Kaimo pašto dėžutė; Sieninė pašto dėžutė; Kita
el: Συμβατός τύπος γραμματοκιβωτίου: Γραμματοκιβώτιο τοποθετημένο σε κολώνα; Κουτί παραλαβής; Γραμματοκιβώτιο επιστολών; Γραμματοκιβώτιο πολλαπλών θέσεων; Γραμματοκιβώτιο δεμάτων; Θυρίδα δεμάτων; Γραμματοκιβώτιο σε στύλο; Αγροτικό γραμματοκιβώτιο; Επιτοίχιο γραμματοκιβώτιο; Άλλο
zh-TW: 相容信箱類型: 柱式信箱; 掛式信箱; 信箱; 多單元信箱; 包裹信箱; 包裹櫃; 立柱式信箱; 鄉村信箱; 壁掛式信箱; 其他
th: ประเภทกล่องจดหมายที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ตู้รับจดหมายแบบติดตั้งบนเสา; ตู้รับเอกสาร; ตู้รับจดหมาย; ตู้รับจดหมายแบบหลายช่อง; ตู้รับพัสดุ; ล็อกเกอร์รับพัสดุ; ตู้รับจดหมายแบบติดตั้งบนเสา; ตู้รับจดหมายและพัสดุขนาดใหญ่; ตู้รับจดหมายแบบฝังกำแพง; อื่นๆ
nb: Kompatibel postkassetype: postkasse montert på kolonne; Drop; Postkasse; Postkasse med flere enheter; Pakkepostkasse; Pakkeskap; Stolpemontert postkasse; Landlig postkasse; Veggmontert postkasse; Annet
it: Tipo di cassetta postale compatibile: Cassetta postale montata su colonna; Cassetta di raccolta; Cassetta delle lettere; Cassetta postale multi-unità; Cassetta postale per pacchi; Armadietto per pacchi; Cassetta postale montata su palo; Cassetta postale rurale; Cassetta postale a parete; Altro
de: Kompatibler Briefkastentyp: Montierte Briefkastenanlage; Durchwurfbriefkasten; Freistehender Briefkasten; Mehrfachbriefkasten; Paketbriefkasten; Paketfach; Pfostenmontierter Briefkasten; Ländlicher Briefkasten; Wandbriefkasten; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tip de cutie poștală compatibilă: Cutie poștală montată pe coloană; Cutie poștală de colectare; Cutie poștală cu fereastră; Cutie poștală cu mai multe unități; Cutie poștală pentru colete; Dulap poștal; Cutie poștală montată pe stâlp; Cutie poștală rurală; Cutie poștală montată pe perete; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de caixa de correio compatível: Caixa de correio montada em coluna; Caixa Drop; Caixa de correio; Caixa de correio para várias unidades; Caixa de correio para encomendas; Cacifo para encomendas; Caixa de correio montada em poste; Caixa de correio rural; Caixa de correio de parede; Outro
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta poštnega nabiralnika: Nabiralnik, nameščen na stebru; Škatla Drop; Poštni nabiralnik; Večnamenski poštni nabiralnik; Poštni nabiralnik za pakete; Omarica za pakete; Nabiralnik, nameščen na stebru; Podeželski poštni nabiralnik; Stenski poštni nabiralnik; Druga
vi: Loại hòm thư tương thích: Hộp thư gắn vào cột; Thùng thu nhận; Hộp thư cá nhân; Hộp thư nhiều ngăn; Hộp thư nhận kiện hàng; Tủ khóa nhận bưu kiện; Hộp thư gắn trên cột; Hộp thư nông thôn; Hộp thư gắn tường; Khác
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta poštanskog sandučića: Poštanski sandučić na stupu; Sandučić; Poštanski sandučić; Poštanski sandučić s više jedinica; Poštanski sandučić za pakete; Ormarić za pakete; Poštanski sandučić montiran na stup; Seoski poštanski sandučić; Zidni poštanski sandučić; Ostalo
hu: Kompatibilis postaláda típusa: Oszlopra szerelhető postaláda; Csomagpont; Levélláda; Több egységből álló postaláda; Csomagfeladó postaláda; Csomagautomata; Oszlopra szerelhető postaláda; Vidéki postaláda; Falra szerelhető postaláda; Egyéb
da: Kompatibel postkassetype: Postkasse monteret på søjle; Dropbox; Brevkasse; Postkasse med flere enheder; Pakkepostkasse; Pakkeboks; Postkasse monteret på stolpe; Landlig postkasse; Vægmonteret postkasse; Andet
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ poštovej schránky: Poštová schránka na stĺpiku; Vhadzovacia poštová schránka; Poštová schránka; Viacnásobná poštová schránka; Poštová schránka na balíky; Úschovňa balíkov; Poštová schránka namontovaná na stĺpiku; Americká poštová schránka; Poštová schránka na stenu; Iné
sv: Typ av kompatibel brevlåda: Kolumnmonterad brevlåda; Brevinkast; Brevlåda; Flerfamiljsbrevlåda; Paketbrevlåda; Paketskåp; Postmonterad brevlåda; Landsbygdsbrevlåda; Väggmonterad brevlåda; Övrigt
ru: Совместимый тип почтового ящика: Почтовый ящик на столбе; Приемный ящик; Почтовый ящик; Многосекционный почтовый ящик; Почтовый ящик для посылок; Постамат; Почтовый ящик на столбе; Сельский почтовый ящик; Настенный почтовый ящик; Другой
fi: Yhteensopiva postilaatikon tyyppi: Tolppakiinnitteinen postilaatikko; Pudotuslaatikko; Kirjelaatikko; Moniosainen postilaatikko; Pakettilaatikko; Pakettilokero; Pylvääseen kiinnitettävä postilaatikko; Maaseudun postilaatikko; Seinään kiinnitettävä postilaatikko; Muu
pl: Zgodny typ skrzynki pocztowej: Skrzynka pocztowa na słupku kolumnowym; Skrzynka wrzutowa; Skrzynka na listy; Skrzynka wielostanowiskowa; Skrzynka na paczki; Skrytka paczkowa; Skrzynka pocztowa montowana na słupku; Skrzynka osiedlowa; Skrzynka ścienna; Pozostałe
en: Compatible mailbox type: Column-mounted mailbox; Drop box; Letterbox; Multi-unit mailbox; Package mailbox; Parcel locker; Post-mounted mailbox; Rural mailbox; Wall-mounted mailbox; Other
ko: 호환 우편함 유형: 기둥 매립형 우편함; 투입형 우편함; 우편함; 다세대 우편함; 택배 사서함; 택배 보관함; 기둥 장착형 우편함; 교외형 우편함; 벽걸이형 우편함; 기타
bg-BG: Съвместим тип пощенска кутия: Пощенска кутия за монтаж на стълб; Кутия за пускане на писма; Отвор за писма; Модулни пощенски кутии; Пощенски кутии за пакети; Шкафче за пратки; Пощенска кутия за монтаж на стълб; Селска пощенска кутия; Пощенска кутия за монтаж на стена; Друго
es: Tipo de buzón compatible: Buzón de columna; Buzón con tapa; Buzón; Buzón de varias unidades; Buzón de paquetes; Taquilla de paquetes; Buzón montado en poste; Buzón rural; Buzón de pared; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de caixa de correio compatível: Caixa de correio montada em coluna; Caixa de coleta; Caixa de correio; Caixa de correio para várias unidades; Caixa de correio para encomendas; Armário para encomendas; Caixa de correio montada em poste; Caixa de correio rural; Caixa de correio de parede; Outro
cs: Kompatibilní typ schránky: Poštovní schránka zazděná do sloupku; Vhazovací poštovní schránka; Schránka na dopisy; Sestava poštovních schránek; Schránka na balíky; Doručovací box; Poštovní schránka na stojanu; Venkovská poštovní schránka; Nástěnná poštovní schránka; Jiné
nl: Compatibel type brievenbus: Zuilbrievenbus; Pakketdropbox; Brievenbus; Groepsbrievenbus; Pakketbrievenbus; Pakketkluis; Paalbrievenbus; Landelijke brievenbus; Muurbrievenbus; Overig
ja: 互換性のある郵便受けの種類: 柱取り付け式郵便受け; ドロップボックス; 郵便受け; マルチユニット郵便受け; 荷物用郵便受け; 宅配ロッカー; 支柱取り付け式郵便受け; 地方の郵便受け; 壁掛け式郵便受け; その他